District of Columbia statutes.
44-2108

Repealed

Admission of insane convicts.

Repealed.

R.S., D.C., § 4852
July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 309, ch. 209, § 1
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(a)
1981 Ed., § 32-608.
1973 Ed., § 32-407
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.